apertium-mar-eng.mar.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ऄअआइईउऊऋऌऍऎएऐऑऒओऔकखगघङचछजझञटठडढणतथदधनऩपफबभमयरऱलळऴवशषसहऻऺऽािीुूृॄॅॆेैॉॊोौ्ॎॐ॓॔क़ख़ग़ज़ड़ढ़फ़य़ॠॡॢॣं</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun . नाम"/>
    <sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective . विशेषण"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"  c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="post"    c="Postposition"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun . सर्वनाम"/>
    <sdef n="post"    c="Postposition"/>
    <sdef n="ij"      c="Interjection"/>

    <sdef n="vbser"   c="Verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Verb . क्रियापद"/>

    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine · पु:लिंग"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine · स्त्रीलिंग"/>
    <sdef n="nt"      c="Neuter · नपुसकलिंग"/>
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculine / Feminine · पु:लिंग /स्त्रीलिंग"/>
    <sdef n="mfn"      c="Masculine / Feminine / Neuter · पु:लिंग / स्त्रीलिंग / नपुसकलिंग"/>

    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular . एकवचन"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural . अनेकवचन"/>
    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular / Plural . एकवचन / अनेकवचन"/>

    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="acc"     c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="erg"     c="Ergative · तृतीय"/>
    <sdef n="dat"     c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="abl"     c="Ablative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="loc"     c="Locative"/>
    <sdef n="obl"     c="Oblique"/>

    <sdef n="tv"      c="Transitive"/>
    <sdef n="iv"      c="Intransitive"/>

    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person · प्रथम पुरुष"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person · द्वितिय पुरुष"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person · तृतिय पुरुष"/>

    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present tense . वर्तमानकाळ"/>
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past tense . भूतकाळ"/>
    <sdef n="fut"     c="Future tense . भविष्यकाळ"/>

    <sdef n="ger"     c="Gerund"/>

    <sdef n="ant"     c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="pers"    c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="impers"  c="Impersonal"/>
    <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogative"/>

    <sdef n="cm"      c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="quot"    c="Quotation mark"/>
    <sdef n="sent"    c="Sentence marker"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[०१२३४५६७८९]+([.,][०१२३४५६७८९]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!।]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><p><l>,</l><r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quot">
      <e><p><l>"</l><r>"<s n="quot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Interjections -->

    <pardef n="नाही/__ij">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="आणि__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    

    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="मी__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="त/ू__prn">
      <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ुला</l><r>ू<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ुला</l><r>ू<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="त/ो__prn">
      <e><p><l>ो</l><r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>्याचा</l><r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याची</l><r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याचे</l><r>ो<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="त/ी__prn">
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्ीला</l><r>ी<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्ीला</l><r>ी<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>िचा</l><r>ी<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><p><l>िची</l><r>ी<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>िचे</l><r>ी<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="त/े__prn">
      <e><p><l>ो</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>्यांचा</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांची</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><p><l>्यांचे</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="त/े__prn_nt">
      <e><p><l>े</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 

    <pardef n="तुम्ह/ी__prn_nt">
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="काय__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

     <pardef n="कोण__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="sp"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   
    
    <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->
 
    <pardef n="कुत्र/ा__n_m">

      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याहून</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यामधे</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांहून</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांमधे</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="मांजर__n_f"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीहून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीमधे</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>  

      <e><p><l>ी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींहून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींमधे</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e> 
    </pardef>

    <e lm="आणि"><i>आणि</i><par n="आणि__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="पण"><i>पण</i><par n="आणि__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="कडे"><i>कडे</i><par n="आणि__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="किंवा"><i>किंवा</i><par n="आणि__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="मी"><i>मी</i><par n="मी__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="तू"><i>त</i><par n="त/ू__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="तो"><i>त</i><par n="त/ो__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ती"><i>त</i><par n="त/ी__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ते"><i>त</i><par n="त/े__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ते"><i>त</i><par n="त/े__prn_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="तुम्ही"><i>तुम्ह</i><par n="तुम्ह/ी__prn_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="त्याचा"><i>त्या</i><par n="त/ो__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="तिचा"><i>ति</i><par n="त/ी__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यांचा"><i>त्यां</i><par n="त/े__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="काय"><i>काय</i><par n="काय__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="कोण"><i>कोण</i><par n="कोण__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="कुत्रा"><i>कुत्र</i><par n="कुत्र/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मांजर"><i>मांजर</i><par n="मांजर__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="नाही"><i>नाही</i><par n="नाही/__ij"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="quot"/></e>
